Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0862.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of natural
resources for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the
following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 2,499.9
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 597,918,100
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 208,300
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 597,709,800
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 102,198,400
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 8,330,900
Total other state restricted revenues 425,493,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 61,686,900
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 149.1
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,023,100
Accounting service center 1,751,800
Executive direction--FTEs 11.6 2,380,000
Finance and operations--FTEs 112.5 19,986,200
Gifts and pass-through transactions 5,003,600
Legal services--FTEs 4.0 725,700
Minerals Management--FTEs 17.0 3,006,800
Natural resources commission 77,100
Office of public lands--FTEs 4.0 1,501,600
Property management 3,611,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,067,300
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG, land acquisition services-to-work orders 208,300
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 836,900
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 5,003,600
Deer habitat reserve 170,000
Forest development fund 4,812,600
Forest land user charges 8,100
Forest recreation account 55,500
Game and fish protection account 8,758,000
Land exchange facilitation and management fund 4,565,400
Local public recreation facilities fund 231,400
Marine safety fund 915,900
Michigan natural resources trust fund 1,717,300
Michigan state parks endowment fund 4,471,500
Nongame wildlife fund 14,100
Off-road vehicle safety education fund 700
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 273,200
Public use and replacement deed fees 30,800
Recreation improvement account 90,200
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 51,400
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 134,600
Sportsmen against hunger fund 500
State park improvement account 2,276,300
Turkey permit fees 81,500
Waterfowl fees 3,400
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Waterways account 956,000
Wildlife resource protection fund 44,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,355,200
Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT INITIATIVES
Full-time equated classified positions 21.0
Great Lakes restoration initiative $ 2,904,500
Invasive species prevention and control--FTEs 21.0 5,997,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,901,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 2,904,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,997,200
Sec. 104. COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES
Full-time equated classified positions 144.3
Cultural resource management--FTEs 5.5 $ 1,037,700
Marketing and outreach--FTEs 95.3 24,204,500
Michigan historical center--FTEs 43.5 7,328,300
Michigan wildlife council 2,803,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 35,373,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 3,419,600
State park improvement, federal 322,200
Special revenue funds:
Forest development fund 179,500
Forest recreation account 19,100
Game and fish protection account 14,164,100
Land exchange facilitation and management fund 52,600
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Marine safety fund 41,300
Michigan historical center operations fund 1,655,700
Michigan state parks endowment fund 123,900
Nongame wildlife fund 12,600
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 120,700
Recreation passport fees 674,200
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 21,700
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 107,800
Sportsmen against hunger fund 1,703,400
State park improvement account 4,416,500
Waterways account 169,800
Wildlife management public education fund 2,803,400
Youth hunting and fishing education and
outreach fund 46,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,319,800
Sec. 105. WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 210.5
Natural resources heritage--FTEs 9.0 $ 842,600
Wildlife management--FTEs 201.5 56,179,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 57,021,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 26,845,400
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 465,700
Cervidae licensing and inspection fees 85,100
Deer habitat reserve 1,824,600
Forest development fund 280,800
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Game and fish protection account 20,713,500
Nongame wildlife fund 483,300
Pheasant hunting license fees 245,800
Turkey permit fees 1,393,100
Waterfowl fees 152,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 4,531,800
Sec. 106. FISHERIES MANAGEMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 208.5
Aquatic resource mitigation--FTEs 2.0 $ 739,200
Fish production--FTEs 59.0 12,870,600
Fisheries resource management--FTEs 147.5 35,394,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 49,004,500
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 12,521,800
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 136,700
Fisheries settlement 739,100
Game and fish protection account 34,359,300
Invasive species fund 100
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,247,500
Sec. 107. LAW ENFORCEMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 298.0
Body cameras for conservation officers--FTEs 5.0 $ 872,300
General law enforcement--FTEs 293.0 57,303,800
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 58,176,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Federal funds 8,482,000
Special revenue funds:
Cervidae licensing and inspection fees 53,400
Forest development fund 45,400
Forest recreation account 72,800
Game and fish protection account 20,592,600
Marine safety fund 3,054,700
Michigan state parks endowment fund 71,400
Off-road vehicle safety education fund 175,400
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 3,415,100
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 726,200
State park improvement account 72,800
Waterways account 21,700
Wildlife resource protection fund 1,196,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 20,195,700
Sec. 108. PARKS AND RECREATION DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 1,095.0
Forest recreation and trails--FTEs 87.4 $ 11,697,400
MacMullan Conference Center--FTEs 15.0 1,380,300
Michigan conservation corps 500,000
Recreational boating--FTEs 182.5 25,689,200
State parks--FTEs 810.1 105,777,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 145,044,200
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 144,200
Michigan state waterways fund, federal 2,172,300
Special revenue funds:
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Private funds 1,000,000
Forest recreation account 6,135,500
MacMullan Conference Center account 1,380,300
Michigan state parks endowment fund 11,531,700
Off-road vehicle safety education fund 8,100
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 3,107,600
Pure Michigan trails fund 100
Recreation improvement account 600,300
Recreation passport fees 220,300
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 17,400
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 2,083,800
State park improvement account 88,288,000
State park improvement account - Belle Isle
subaccount 875,000
Waterways account 23,543,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,936,100
Sec. 109. MACKINAC ISLAND STATE PARK COMMISSION
Full-time equated classified positions 17.0
Historical facilities system--FTEs 13.0 $ 1,746,700
Mackinac Island State Park operations--FTEs 4.0 139,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,886,000
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Mackinac Island State Park fund 1,740,900
Mackinac Island State Park operation fund 139,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,800
Sec. 110. FOREST RESOURCES DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 356.5
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Forest management and timber market
development--FTEs 219.5 $ 51,175,500
Wildfire protection--FTEs 137.0 23,547,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 74,723,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 6,128,600
Federal national forest timber fund 9,147,600
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 1,624,900
Commercial forest fund 26,000
Fire equipment fund 668,700
Forest development fund 43,196,300
Forest land user charges 252,000
Game and fish protection account 855,900
Waterways account 55,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 12,767,500
Sec. 111. GRANTS
Dam management grant program $ 350,000
Deer habitat improvement partnership initiative 200,000
Federal - clean vessel act grants 400,000
Federal - forest stewardship grants 2,000,000
Federal - rural community fire protection 1,050,000
Federal - urban forestry grants 900,000
Grants to communities - federal oil, gas, and
timber payments 3,450,000
Grants to counties - marine safety 3,074,700
National recreational trails 3,913,500
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Nonmotorized trail development and maintenance
grants 200,000
Off-road vehicle safety training grants 60,000
Off-road vehicle trail improvement grants 6,216,800
Recreation improvement fund grants 916,800
Recreation passport local grants 4,000,000
Snowmobile law enforcement grants 380,100
Snowmobile local grants program 9,590,400
Trail easements 700,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,402,300
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 13,280,900
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 100,000
Deer habitat reserve 200,000
Local public recreation facilities fund 4,000,000
Marine safety fund 1,407,300
Off-road vehicle safety education fund 60,000
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 6,216,800
Permanent snowmobile trail easement fund 700,000
Recreation improvement account 916,800
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 380,100
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 9,590,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 550,000
Sec. 112. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 10,874,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,874,500
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Special revenue funds:
Commercial forest fund 2,100
Deer habitat reserve 62,000
Forest development fund 1,577,600
Forest land user charges 24,100
Forest recreation account 44,300
Game and fish protection account 3,966,000
Land exchange facilitation and management fund 30,800
Marine safety fund 166,200
Michigan natural resources trust fund 24,800
Michigan state parks endowment fund 1,366,200
Nongame wildlife fund 30,700
Off-road vehicle safety education fund 10,500
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 29,200
Pure Michigan trails fund 100
Recreation improvement account 49,500
Snowmobile registration fee revenue 11,700
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 76,000
Sportsmen against hunger fund 600
State park improvement account 1,528,500
Turkey permit fees 34,000
Waterfowl fees 3,300
Waterways account 511,800
Wildlife resource protection fund 42,300
Youth hunting and fishing education and
outreach fund 2,000
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


State general fund/general purpose $ 1,280,200
Sec. 113. CAPITAL OUTLAY
(1) RECREATIONAL LANDS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Federal - land and water conservation fund
payments $ 12,900,000
Fisheries infrastructure 1,326,900
Off-road vehicle trail development and
maintenance 1,000,000
Snowmobile trail development and maintenance 2,800,000
State game and wildlife area infrastructure 3,864,500
State parks repair and maintenance 30,450,000
Wetland restoration, enhancement, and
acquisition 1,933,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 55,375,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 14,025,000
Special revenue funds:
Private funds
Game and fish protection account 4,066,400
Michigan state parks endowment fund 12,600,000
Off-road vehicle trail improvement fund 1,000,000
Recreation improvement account 1,100,000
Recreation passport fees 16,350,000
Snowmobile trail improvement fund 2,800,000
Waterfowl hunt stamp 933,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,500,000
(2) WATERWAYS BOATING PROGRAM
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Local boating infrastructure maintenance and
improvements $ 5,000,000
State boating infrastructure maintenance 20,067,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,067,400
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 1,667,400
Michigan state waterways fund, federal 300,000
Special revenue funds:
Waterways account 23,100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 114. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Whitefish recovery $ 100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 0
State general fund/general purpose $ 100

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is
$487,680,400.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $15,262,100.00.
The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


which spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Dam management grant program $ 175,000
Fisheries habitat improvement grants 125,000
Grants to counties – marine safety 1,407,300
Invasive species prevention and control 2,179,200
Local boating infrastructure maintenance and 5,000,000
improvements
Nonmotorized trail development and maintenance 100,000
grants
Off-road vehicle safety training grants 60,000
Off-road vehicle trail improvement grants 1,067,600
Recreation improvement fund grants 91,700
Recreation passport local grants 4,525,900
Snowmobile law enforcement grants 380,100
Wildlife habitat improvement grants 150,300
TOTAL $ 15,262,100
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(e) "Standard report recipients" means the senate
appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources,
the house appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural
development and natural resources, the senate and house fiscal
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget
office.
Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the
reporting requirements of this part and shall make each report
readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under this part, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 206. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 207. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 208. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified
employees in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard
report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations
committees. The report must include all of the following
information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund or
general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific
sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund or general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund or general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for
state restricted contingency authorization. These funds are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. (1) The department shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the
department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
(2) The department shall cooperate with the department of
technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website
on a quarterly basis.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


with the state budget office to provide an annual report on the
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and
house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the senate and house appropriations
committees and the standard report recipients.
Sec. 216. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 217. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 218. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
number. The department shall submit the report to the standard
report recipients, the senate and house appropriations committees,
and the joint committee on administrative rules.
Sec. 219. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 220. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 221. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


(a) To reclassify general fund or general purpose
appropriations for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public
health and safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund or general purpose
appropriations for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public
health and safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2 must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 222. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


amounts.
Sec. 223. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing significant federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to, significantly impact the
operations of the department, including reductions in federal
revenue and changes that are likely to lead to a reduction in the
department's ability to safeguard the health or welfare of the
public.
Sec. 224. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $23,478,400.00. From this amount, total
department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $23,478,400.00. Total department appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 225. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 227. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 228. Not later than November 15, the department must
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount and source of funding received,
the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any
remaining funds, if any. The report must be submitted to the
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 229. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the
house of representatives and senate shall provide to the state
budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively directed
spending items funded in part 1 as defined in section 364 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364. The list must
include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed under section 364 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 230. (1) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated, from the following state restricted funds
and accounts of the Michigan conservation and recreation legacy
fund, the following amounts to the following departments and
officers:
(a) Department of technology, management, and budget:
Game and fish protection account $ 659,600
Waterways account 177,200
State park improvement account 158,300
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Forest development fund 354,600
(b) Department of attorney general:
Game and fish protection account $ 693,300
Waterways account 156,300
(c) Legislative auditor general:
Game and fish protection account $ 39,100
Waterways account 14,100
(d) Department of treasury:
Game and fish protection account $ 4,812,400
Waterways account 495,000
Michigan natural resources trust fund 3,289,700
(2) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated from the following state restricted funds to the civil
service commission the amount calculated for each fund pursuant to
section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963:
(a) Michigan conservation and recreation legacy fund.
(b) Forest development fund.
(c) Michigan natural resources trust fund.
(d) Michigan state parks endowment fund.
(e) Michigan nongame fish and wildlife trust fund.
Sec. 231. Pursuant to section 43703(3) of the natural
resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL
324.43703, there is appropriated from the Michigan game and fish
protection trust fund to the game and fish protection account of
the Michigan conservation and recreation legacy fund, $6,000,000.00
for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027.
Sec. 232. The department may contract with or provide grants
to local units of government, institutions of higher education, or
nonprofit organizations to support activities authorized by
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


appropriations in part 1. As used in this section, contracts and
grants include, but are not limited to, contracts and grants for
research, wildlife and fisheries management, forest management,
invasive species monitoring and control, and natural-resource-
related programs.
Sec. 233. (1) The department may accept monetary and
nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants
from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part,
a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or
use such gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for
the purposes designated by the private or public source, if the
purpose is specified.
(2) Amounts remaining from revenue collected by the department
under this section that are unexpended and unencumbered must not
lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the
subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 234. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.

COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES
Sec. 240. (1) In addition to supporting the existing
archeological responsibilities of the department within the
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Michigan History Center, the funds appropriated in part 1 for
cultural resource management and cultural resource management one-
time must be utilized to establish an ongoing process of increased
consultation with known lineal descendants and officials of Native
American tribes on whose aboriginal lands a planned archeological
activity will occur or an inadvertent discovery has been made. The
consultation must address the identification, treatment, and
disposition of Native American cultural items.
(2) The department is encouraged to, whenever possible,
repatriate or transfer from its collections Native American
cultural items, including human remains, funerary objects, sacred
objects, and objects of cultural patrimony, to the lineal
descendants and to Native American tribes described in subsection
(1).

DEPARTMENT INITIATIVES
Sec. 251. From the amounts appropriated in part 1 for invasive
species prevention and control, the department shall allocate not
less than $2,400,000.00 for grants for the prevention, detection,
eradication, and control of invasive species.
Sec. 252. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
revenue deposited in the invasive species fund created in section
41311 of the natural resources and environmental protection act,
1994 PA 451, MCL 324.41311, is appropriated and may be expended for
invasive species immediate response efforts.
(2) The department shall annually notify the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on natural resources and the house and
senate fiscal agencies of any expenditure of funds appropriated
under subsection (1).
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


Sec. 257. The department shall prioritize right-of-way permits
or easements for construction or maintenance of broadband
facilities on state land and shall not require a centerline survey
as a condition of the road right-of-way permit or easement if the
applicant can provide detailed engineering plans and if the
broadband facilities are contained completely in the right-of-way.
If the broadband provider secures a road right-of-way permit to
construct or maintain broadband facilities required by the
municipal, county, or state entity that owns or controls the public
road, the department shall not require the broadband provider to
obtain a permit or easement if the broadband facility is contained
completely within the road right-of-way. If installation of
broadband facilities cannot be contained completely within the
right-of-way and requires placement of the infrastructure on public
lands, an easement will be required, and a certified survey may be
required. If installation of broadband facilities being placed in
the road right-of-way requires utilization of public lands, a
permit may be required.

DEPARTMENT SUPPORT SERVICES
Sec. 302. The department may charge land acquisition projects
appropriated for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and for
prior fiscal years, a standard percentage fee to recover actual
costs, and may use the revenue derived to fund the land acquisition
service charges provided for in part 1.
Sec. 303. As appropriated in part 1, the department may charge
both application fees and transaction fees related to the exchange
or sale of state-owned land or rights in land authorized by part 21
of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


451, MCL 324.2101 to 324.2165. To the extent consistent with part
21 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994
PA 451, MCL 324.2101 to 324.2165, fees must be set by the director
at a rate that allows the department to recover its costs for
providing these services.
Sec. 304. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may receive and expend money from state restricted
sources to pay vendor costs associated with administering sales of
carbon offset credits.

COMMUNICATION AND CUSTOMER SERVICES
Sec. 408. By December 1, the department shall submit to the
senate and house appropriations subcommittees on natural resources
a report on all land transactions completed by the department in
the prior fiscal year. For each land transaction, the report must
include the size of the parcel, or for subdivided parcels, the
number of parcels, the county and municipality in which the parcel
is located, the dollar amount of the transaction, the fund source
affected by the transaction, and the transaction type.

FOREST RESOURCES DIVISION
Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall, by January 1, prepare and submit to the senate
appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources,
the house appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural
development and natural resources, and the standing committees of
the senate and house with primary responsibility for natural
resources issues a report on all of the following:
(a) The number of acres of state forestland prepared for
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


timber harvesting in the prior fiscal year.
(b) The number of acres of state forestland timber sold for
harvest in the prior fiscal year.
(c) The amount of revenue generated from state forest timber
sale receipts in the prior fiscal year.
Sec. 803. In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the
department may receive and expend money from federal sources to
provide response to wildfires and hazard incidents as required by a
compact with the federal government. If additional expenditure
authorization is required, the department shall so notify the state
budget office. The department shall notify the senate
appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources,
the house appropriations subcommittees subcommittee on agriculture
and rural development and natural resources, and the house and
senate fiscal agencies by November 15 of the expenditures under
this section during the prior fiscal year.
Sec. 807. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency
fund up to $800,000.00 to cover department costs related to any
disaster as defined in section 2 of the emergency management act,
1976 PA 390, MCL 30.402.
(2) Funds appropriated under subsection (1) must not be
expended unless the state budget director recommends the
expenditure and the department notifies the house and senate
committees on appropriations. By December 1 each year, the
department shall provide a report to the senate and house fiscal
agencies and the state budget office on the use of the disaster and
emergency contingency fund during the prior fiscal year.
(3) If Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA)
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


reimbursement is approved for costs paid from the disaster and
emergency contingency fund, the federal revenue must be deposited
into the disaster and emergency contingency fund.

GRANTS
Sec. 1001. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions
and governments that are received in amounts in addition to those
included in part 1 for grants to communities - federal oil, gas,
and timber payments and that do not require additional state
matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended. By
November 30, the department shall report to the senate
appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and natural resources,
the house appropriations subcommittee on agriculture and rural
development and natural resources, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, and the state budget director on all amounts appropriated
under this section during the prior fiscal year.

CAPITAL OUTLAY
Sec. 1103. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay
must be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent
with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1248.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1201. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for whitefish
recovery must be used by the department to support efforts to
recover and monitor not more than 3 lake whitefish stocks.
(2) Funds appropriated under this section must be used for
activities that include, but are not limited to, spawning and
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc


rearing activities and post-stocking assessment and evaluation
necessary to support lake whitefish stock recovery.
(3) The department may contract with or enter into agreements
with qualified nonprofit, research-based organizations to implement
a lake whitefish stock recovery plan developed by the department.
(4) Activities under this section must be conducted using
department-owned hatchery facilities or facilities owned or
operated by partners contracted under subsection (3).
(5) Funds appropriated under this section must not be used for
operational expenses or for the support of full-time equated
positions or permanent state positions. The department may utilize
limited-term employees as necessary to carry out the purposes of
this section.
Final Page
WAM S06115'26 (S-1) xtbwoc